Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-347
Inventory statement; duty of county officers to make; filing.

Within two calendar months after the close of each fiscal year, each county officer shall make, acknowledge under oath, and file with the county board of his or her county an inventory statement of all county personal property in the custody and possession of said county officer. The county board in each county shall examine into each inventory statement so filed, and, if said statement is correct and proper in every particular, the county board shall deliver each of said inventory statements to the clerk of the county for filing as a public record in said county clerk's office in a manner convenient for reference.

Laws 1939, c. 28, § 2, p. 140;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-759;

R.S.1943, § 23-347;

Laws 1981, LB 41, § 1.